test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lyeme_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - lye´me: # eres
    lye´me+N+Sg+Nom: lye´me
    lye´me+N+Sg+Gen: luámmán
    lye´me+N+Sg+Acc: luámmán
    lye´me+N+Sg+Ill: luá´mánân
    lye´me+N+Sg+Loc: luá´mánist
    lye´me+N+Sg+Com: luá´mánáin
    lye´me+N+Sg+Abe: luámmánttáá
    lye´me+N+Ess: [luá´mánin, lyemeen]
    lye´me+N+Par: [luá´mánid, lyemeed]
    lye´me+N+Pl+Nom: luá´máneh
    lye´me+N+Pl+Gen: luá´mánij
    lye´me+N+Pl+Acc: luá´mánijd
    lye´me+N+Pl+Ill: luá´mánáid
    lye´me+N+Pl+Loc: luá´mánijn
    lye´me+N+Pl+Com: luá´mánijguin
    lye´me+N+Pl+Abe: luá´mánijttáá
